Utah statutes.
23-19-21.   Fishing license.
(1)  A person 12 years of age or older shall purchase a fishing license before
engaging in any regulated fishing activity.
(2)  A person 12 years of age or older, upon paying the fee prescribed by the
Wildlife Board, may obtain a license to fish:
(a)  for one day;
(b)  for seven consecutive days; or
(c)  for 365 consecutive days from the date of sale.
(3)  A person under 12 years of age may fish without a license according to
rules, proclamations, and orders set forth by the Wildlife Board.
(4)  The effective date shall be indicated on the license.
